Florida, session 2026, HB55.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 944.092, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
944.092 Basic rights of inmates.—
(1) RIGHTS.—Each inmate in the correctional system has the
right to:
(a) Proper ventilation.—All housing units must have air
conditioning systems or air cooling systems; however, housing
units in use on or before July 1, 2026, which cannot be fitted
for air conditioning systems or air cooling systems shall
receive exhaust and air circulators sufficient to provide a safe
and healthful environment for inmates.
(b) Sufficient meal time.—Inmates must receive a minimum
of 20 minutes to eat each meal. The minimum time shall be
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb55-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 55 2026
extended to the amount necessary for an inmate to complete the
meal if the inmate receives an approved medical reason for such
an extension.
(c) Adequate food supply in case of emergency.—Each
correctional institution shall establish a program with one or
more community food banks located near the institution to ensure
adequate food supply is made available to the inmate population
if conditions exist that prevent regular food supply services
due to an event such as a natural disaster or other emergency.
(d) Necessary health supplies.—The department must
provide:
1. Necessary personal protective equipment for medical
staff at all times and for all staff and inmates during health
crises or during any cleaning.
2. Necessary health products for inmates including, but
not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons, soap, and toothpaste,
upon request of inmates.
(2) NOTICE.—The department shall provide a written copy of
the rights established in this section to each inmate upon his
or her entry into the correctional system.
(3) GRIEVANCES.—An inmate may file a grievance with the
department if the inmate believes a right guaranteed in this
section is denied by a correctional institution.
Section 2. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
947.149, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb55-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 55 2026
947.149 Conditional medical release.—
(1) The commission shall, in conjunction with the
department, establish the conditional medical release program.
An inmate is eligible for consideration for release under the
conditional medical release program when the inmate, because of
an existing medical or physical condition, is determined by the
department to be within one of the following designations:
(a) "Permanently incapacitated inmate," which means an
inmate who:
1. Has a condition caused by injury, disease, or illness
which, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, renders the
inmate permanently and irreversibly physically incapacitated; or
2. Has a physical disability, impairment, or handicap,

to the extent that the inmate does not constitute a danger to
herself or himself or others.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb55-00